Utah statutes.
26A-1-108.7 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Procurement -- Use of recycled goods.

The procurement officer or other person responsible for purchasing supplies for each local health department shall:

(1)  maintain for reference a copy of the current listing of recycled items available on state contract as issued by the chief procurement officer under Section 63G-6-204; and

(2)  give recycled items consideration when inviting bids and purchasing supplies, in compliance with Section 11-37-101.

